District of Columbia statutes.
10-1104.08

Subchapter not to affect provisions of § 9-113.04.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed to affect in any manner the provisions of § 9-113.04 [repealed] with respect to streets heretofore or hereafter dedicated in accordance with the provisions of such section, and to make use of the parking on any such street in accordance with the terms of the 4th proviso of such section, relating to the height of parking and the projection of buildings beyond the building line, the District’s right-of-way through said parking for sewers and water mains free of cost, and the use of the parking by the District for the construction of sidewalks.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1164, Pub. L. 90-596, title IV, § 408

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1023.
1973 Ed., § 7-924.

Prior Codifications

Section 7-117 referred to in the first sentence was repealed, effective March 10, 1983, by D.C. Law 4-201, § 713. For present provisions regarding the naming of public places, see subchapter IV of Chapter 4 of this title.

References in Text